Utah statutes.
59-23-2.   Intent statement.
It is the policy of the state that when its natural resources are used, a
royalty should be paid to compensate the state for the use of the natural
resource.  The state receives royalties on minerals extracted from the Great
Salt Lake.  A market has developed for brine shrimp eggs; therefore, the state
should be compensated for the use of this natural resource.
